Ohio, session 136, HB500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3313.907 and 3317.166 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3313.907. A school district may designate either of the following programs it offers and that is approved under Title 10 of the United States Code as part of the district's career-technical education program under section 3313.90 of the Revised Code: (A) A junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States; (B) A national defense cadet corps (NDCC) program approved by the secretary of a military department of the United States armed forces, as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.166. The department of education and workforce shall include in the calculation of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's career-technical education funding any program designated by the district as part of its career-technical education program under section 3313.907 of the Revised Code. For that purpose, the department shall determine in which category of career-technical education programs under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code to include those types of programs.